Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 6

Cordell Hull Birthplace

4-13-601. [Reserved.]

The administration, operation and maintenance of the Cordell Hull birthplace and all surrounding property that have been deeded to the state are hereby vested in the department of environment and conservation, division of parks and recreation.

The department shall promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary for the efficient operation, administration, and maintenance of the Cordell Hull birthplace.

One (1) seasonal, full-time park manager position and one (1) full-time custodial position shall be created and funded within the department for the operation and management of the Cordell Hull birthplace. The department shall establish qualifications for such positions and employ appropriate personnel to perform the duties and functions of such positions.

Acts 1989, ch. 584, § 2; 1997, ch. 401, §§ 2, 4.

4-13-603. Expenditure of funds.

The department of environment and conservation is authorized to expend any funds appropriated or available to it in the administration, operation, maintenance, repair, renovation or restoration of the Cordell Hull birthplace and all surrounding property that have been deeded to the state.

Acts 1989, ch. 584, § 3; 1997, ch. 401, § 3.

4-13-604. Designation of personnel — Rules and regulations.

The department of environment and conservation has the right to designate the personnel who shall have actual charge of the premises and has the right to promulgate rules and regulations with respect to the Cordell Hull birthplace.

Acts 1989, ch. 584, § 4; 1997, ch. 401, § 6.

4-13-605. Historical papers and correspondence — Removal of papers or letters.

The department of environment and conservation may enter into all necessary agreements with the state library and archives to ensure the preservation of the historical papers and personal correspondence of Cordell Hull for posterity.

No historical paper or item of personal correspondence shall be removed from the Cordell Hull birthplace without the express written consent of the Friends of Cordell Hull, the successor organization to the Cordell Hull Birthplace and Memorial Association and the true owner of such collection. The Friends of Cordell Hull may, in consultation with the department, develop and implement policies and guidelines for the loan or other removal of such historical papers and items of personal correspondence from the Cordell Hull birthplace. Such historical papers and items of personal correspondence may only be removed from the site with the stipulation, agreed to by the Friends of Cordell Hull and the borrower, of a specific date for the return of such item or items.

Acts 1989, ch. 584, § 5; 1997, ch. 401, § 5.

Parts 7-9

[Reserved]